Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.201

Noxious weed control on federal and tribal lands—State and county cooperation.

(1) The state noxious weed control board shall:

(a) Work with the various federal and tribal land management agencies to coordinate state and federal noxious weed control;

(b) Encourage the various federal and tribal land management agencies to devote more time and resources to noxious weed control; and

(c) Assist the various federal and tribal land management agencies by seeking adequate funding for noxious weed control.

(2) County noxious weed control boards and weed districts shall work with the various federal and tribal land management agencies in each county in order to:

(a) Identify new noxious weed infestations;

(b) Outline and plan necessary noxious weed control actions;

(c) Develop coordinated noxious weed control programs; and

(d) Notify local federal and tribal agency land managers of noxious weed infestations.

(3) The department of agriculture, county noxious weed control boards, and weed districts are authorized to enter federal lands, with the approval of the appropriate federal agency, to survey for and control noxious weeds where control measures of a type and extent required under this chapter have not been taken.

(4) The department of agriculture, county noxious weed control boards, and weed districts may bill the federal land management agency that manages the land for all costs of the noxious weed control performed on federal land. If not paid by the federal agency that manages the land, the cost of the noxious weed control on federal land may be paid from any funds available to the county noxious weed control board or weed district that performed the noxious weed control. Alternatively, the costs of noxious weed control on federal land may be paid from any funds specifically appropriated to the department of agriculture for that purpose.

(5) The department of agriculture, county noxious weed control boards, and weed districts are authorized to enter into any reasonable agreement with the appropriate authorities for the control of noxious weeds on federal or tribal lands.

(6) The department of agriculture, county noxious weed control boards, and weed districts shall consult with state agencies managing federal land concerning noxious weed infestation and control programs.

[ 1997 c 353 s 34.]